turkish.lexc
! ============================================================
! Turkish Morphology - Complete Lexicon
! ALL surface forms explicit - zero reliance on xfst rules
! ============================================================

Multichar_Symbols
+Noun +Verb +Adj
+Sg +Pl
+Nom +Acc +Dat +Loc +Abl +Gen +Ins
+P1sg +P2sg +P3sg +P1pl +P2pl +P3pl
+Pres +Past +Evid +Fut +Cond +Nec +Aor +Opt
+Neg +Pass +Caus +Refl +Recip +Abil
+1sg +2sg +3sg +1pl +2pl +3pl
+CopPres +CopPast
+Inf +VN +Imp
+2plFml

LEXICON Root
    Nouns;
    Verbs;
    Adjectives;

! ============================================================
! NOUNS
! ============================================================

LEXICON Nouns
    NounRoots;

LEXICON NounRoots
! back unrounded vowel-final
araba+Noun:araba    NounVHA_V;
! back unrounded cons-final regular
ev+Noun:ev          NounVHE_C;
! back unrounded cons-final K-alternating (çocuk: k/ğ)
çocuk+Noun:çocuk    NounVHO_Chard;
çocuk+Noun:çocuğ    NounVHO_Csoft;
! back unrounded cons-final P-alternating (kitap: p/b)
kitap+Noun:kitap    NounVHA_Chard;
kitap+Noun:kitab    NounVHA_Csoft;
! back unrounded cons-final C-alternating (ağaç: ç/c)
ağaç+Noun:ağaç      NounVHA_Chard2;
ağaç+Noun:ağac      NounVHA_Csoft;
! front rounded cons-final regular
gün+Noun:gün        NounVHU_C;
köy+Noun:köy        NounVHU_C;

! ============================================================
! BACK UNROUNDED VOWEL-FINAL (araba)
! ============================================================

LEXICON NounVHA_V
+Sg+Nom:0       NounPossVHA_V;
+Sg+Acc:yı      NounPossVHA_C;
+Sg+Dat:ya      NounPossVHA_C;
+Sg+Loc:da      NounPossVHA_C;
+Sg+Abl:dan     NounPossVHA_C;
+Sg+Gen:nın     NounPossVHA_C;
+Pl+Nom:lar     NounPossVHA_C;
+Pl+Acc:ları    NounPossVHA_C;
+Pl+Dat:lara    NounPossVHA_C;
+Pl+Loc:larda   NounPossVHA_C;
+Pl+Abl:lardan  NounPossVHA_C;
                NounCopVHA;

! ============================================================
! FRONT UNROUNDED CONS-FINAL (ev)
! ============================================================

LEXICON NounVHE_C
+Sg+Nom:0       NounPossVHE_C;
+Sg+Acc:i       NounPossVHE_C;
+Sg+Dat:e       NounPossVHE_C;
+Sg+Loc:de      NounPossVHE_C;
+Sg+Abl:den     NounPossVHE_C;
+Sg+Gen:in      NounPossVHE_C;
+Pl+Nom:ler     NounPossVHE_C;
+Pl+Acc:leri    NounPossVHE_C;
+Pl+Dat:lere    NounPossVHE_C;
+Pl+Loc:lerde   NounPossVHE_C;
+Pl+Abl:lerden  NounPossVHE_C;
                NounCopVHE;

! ============================================================
! BACK ROUNDED K-ALTERNATING (çocuk: k final / ğ before vowel)
! ============================================================

LEXICON NounVHO_Chard
+Sg+Nom:0       #;
+Sg+Loc:ta      #;
+Sg+Abl:tan     #;
+Sg+Gen:un      #;
+Pl+Nom:lar     #;

LEXICON NounVHO_Csoft
+Sg+Acc:u       #;
+Sg+Dat:a       #;

! ============================================================
! BACK UNROUNDED P-ALTERNATING (kitap: p final / b before vowel)
! ============================================================

LEXICON NounVHA_Chard
+Sg+Nom:0       #;
+Sg+Loc:ta      #;
+Sg+Abl:tan     #;
+Sg+Gen:ın      #;
+Pl+Nom:lar     #;

LEXICON NounVHA_Csoft
+Sg+Acc:ı       #;
+Sg+Dat:a       #;

! ============================================================
! BACK UNROUNDED C-ALTERNATING (ağaç: ç final / c before vowel)
! ============================================================

LEXICON NounVHA_Chard2
+Sg+Nom:0       #;
+Sg+Loc:ta      #;
+Sg+Abl:tan     #;
+Sg+Gen:ın      #;
+Pl+Nom:lar     #;

! ============================================================
! FRONT ROUNDED CONS-FINAL (gün, köy)
! ============================================================

LEXICON NounVHU_C
+Sg+Nom:0       NounPossVHU_C;
+Sg+Acc:ü       NounPossVHU_C;
+Sg+Dat:e       NounPossVHU_C;
+Sg+Loc:de      NounPossVHU_C;
+Sg+Abl:den     NounPossVHU_C;
+Sg+Gen:ün      NounPossVHU_C;
+Pl+Nom:ler     NounPossVHE_C;
+Pl+Acc:leri    NounPossVHE_C;
+Pl+Dat:lere    NounPossVHE_C;
                NounCopVHU;

! ============================================================
! POSSESSIVES
! ============================================================

LEXICON NounPossVHA_V
0           #;
+P1sg:m     #;
+P2sg:n     #;
+P3sg:sı    #;
+P1pl:mız   #;
+P2pl:nız   #;
+P3pl:ları  #;
            NounCopVHA;

LEXICON NounPossVHA_C
0           #;
+P1sg:ım    #;
+P2sg:ın    #;
+P3sg:ı     #;
+P1pl:ımız  #;
+P2pl:ınız  #;
+P3pl:ları  #;
            NounCopVHA;

LEXICON NounPossVHE_C
0           #;
+P1sg:im    #;
+P2sg:in    #;
+P3sg:i     #;
+P1pl:imiz  #;
+P2pl:iniz  #;
+P3pl:leri  #;
            NounCopVHE;

LEXICON NounPossVHU_C
0           #;
+P1sg:üm    #;
+P2sg:ün    #;
+P3sg:ü     #;
+P1pl:ümüz  #;
+P2pl:ünüz  #;
+P3pl:leri  #;
            NounCopVHU;

! ============================================================
! NOMINAL COPULA
! ============================================================

LEXICON NounCopVHA
+CopPres+1sg:yım    #;
+CopPres+2sg:sın    #;
+CopPres+3sg:dır    #;
+CopPast+1sg:dım    #;
+CopPast+2sg:dın    #;
+CopPast+3sg:dı     #;

LEXICON NounCopVHE
+CopPres+1sg:im     #;
+CopPres+2sg:sin    #;
+CopPres+3sg:dir    #;
+CopPast+1sg:dim    #;
+CopPast+2sg:din    #;
+CopPast+3sg:di     #;

LEXICON NounCopVHU
+CopPres+1sg:yüm    #;
+CopPres+2sg:sün    #;
+CopPres+3sg:dür    #;
+CopPast+1sg:düm    #;
+CopPast+2sg:dün    #;
+CopPast+3sg:dü     #;

! ============================================================
! VERBS
! ============================================================

LEXICON Verbs
    VerbRoots;

LEXICON VerbRoots
! front unrounded
gel+Verb:gel        VerbVHE;
bil+Verb:bil        VerbVHE;
ver+Verb:ver        VerbVHE;
! git: special - past tense gemination (gittim not gitdim)
git+Verb:git        VerbGit;
! front rounded
gör+Verb:gör        VerbVHU;
gül+Verb:gül        VerbVHU;
! back unrounded - regular aorist -ar
yap+Verb:yap        VerbVHA;
bak+Verb:bak        VerbVHA;
yaz+Verb:yaz        VerbVHA;
koş+Verb:koş        VerbVHA;
! back unrounded - aorist -ır (monosyllabic l-final)
al+Verb:al          VerbVHA_L;
! back rounded vowel-final
oku+Verb:oku        VerbVHO_V;

! ============================================================
! FRONT UNROUNDED VERBS (gel, bil)
! ============================================================

LEXICON VerbVHE
+Neg:0              VerbTAM_VHE_Neg;
+Pass:il            VerbTAM_VHE;
+Caus:dir           VerbTAM_VHE;
0                   VerbTAM_VHE;

LEXICON VerbTAM_VHE
+Pres:iyor          VerbAgrPres;
+Past:di            VerbAgrPast_VHE;
+Past+Evid:miş      VerbAgrPast_VHE;
! FIX: future 1sg uses ğ form directly: geleceğ+im
+Fut:ecek           VerbAgrFut_VHE;
+Fut:eceğ           VerbAgrFut_VHE_V;
+Cond:se            VerbAgrCond_VHE;
+Nec:meli           VerbAgrNec_VHE;
+Aor:ir             VerbAgrAor_VHE;
+Inf:mek            #;
+VN:me              #;
+Imp:0              VerbAgrImp_VHE;

! negation: me+yor -> miyor
LEXICON VerbTAM_VHE_Neg
+Pres:miyor         VerbAgrPres;
+Past:medi          VerbAgrPast_VHE;

LEXICON VerbAgrPast_VHE
+1sg:m      #;
+2sg:n      #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:k      #;
+2pl:niz    #;
+3pl:ler    #;

! fut consonant-final agreement (geleceksin, gelecek, gelecekler)
LEXICON VerbAgrFut_VHE
+2sg:sin    #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:iz     #;
+2pl:siniz  #;
+3pl:ler    #;

! fut vowel-initial agreement (geleceğim, geleceğiz)
LEXICON VerbAgrFut_VHE_V
+1sg:im     #;

LEXICON VerbAgrCond_VHE
+1sg:m      #;
+2sg:n      #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:k      #;
+2pl:niz    #;
+3pl:ler    #;

LEXICON VerbAgrNec_VHE
+1sg:yim    #;
+2sg:sin    #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:yiz    #;
+2pl:siniz  #;
+3pl:ler    #;

LEXICON VerbAgrAor_VHE
+1sg:im     #;
+2sg:sin    #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:iz     #;
+2pl:siniz  #;
+3pl:ler    #;

LEXICON VerbAgrImp_VHE
+2sg:0      #;
+2pl:in     #;
+3sg:sin    #;
+3pl:sinler #;

! ============================================================
! SHARED PRESENT AGREEMENT
! ============================================================

LEXICON VerbAgrPres
+1sg:um     #;
+2sg:sun    #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:uz     #;
+2pl:sunuz  #;
+3pl:lar    #;

! ============================================================
! GIT - special past tense (gittim not gitdim)
! ============================================================

LEXICON VerbGit
+Neg:0              VerbTAM_VHE_Neg;
0                   VerbTAM_Git;

LEXICON VerbTAM_Git
+Pres:iyor          VerbAgrPres;
! FIX: git past tense uses geminate tt directly
+Past:ti            VerbAgrPast_VHE;
+Past+Evid:miş      VerbAgrPast_VHE;
+Fut:ecek           VerbAgrFut_VHE;
+Fut:eceğ           VerbAgrFut_VHE_V;
+Cond:se            VerbAgrCond_VHE;
+Nec:meli           VerbAgrNec_VHE;
+Aor:ir             VerbAgrAor_VHE;
+Inf:mek            #;
+VN:me              #;
+Imp:0              VerbAgrImp_VHE;

! ============================================================
! BACK UNROUNDED VERBS - aorist -ar (yap)
! ============================================================

LEXICON VerbVHA
+Neg:0              VerbTAM_VHA_Neg;
+Pass:ıl            VerbTAM_VHA;
! FIX: causative -tır directly after voiceless p
+Caus:tır           VerbTAM_VHA;
0                   VerbTAM_VHA;

LEXICON VerbTAM_VHA
+Pres:ıyor          VerbAgrPres;
! FIX: past tense -tı directly after voiceless p
+Past:tı            VerbAgrPast_VHA;
+Past+Evid:mış      VerbAgrPast_VHA;
+Fut:acak           VerbAgrFut_VHA;
+Fut:acağ           VerbAgrFut_VHA_V;
+Cond:sa            VerbAgrCond_VHA;
+Nec:malı           VerbAgrNec_VHA;
+Aor:ar             VerbAgrAor_VHA;
+Inf:mak            #;
+VN:ma              #;
+Imp:0              VerbAgrImp_VHA;

! negation: ma+yor -> mıyor
LEXICON VerbTAM_VHA_Neg
+Pres:mıyor         VerbAgrPres;
+Past:madı          VerbAgrPast_VHA;

LEXICON VerbAgrPast_VHA
+1sg:m      #;
+2sg:n      #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:k      #;
+2pl:nız    #;
+3pl:lar    #;

LEXICON VerbAgrFut_VHA
+2sg:sın    #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:ız     #;
+2pl:sınız  #;
+3pl:lar    #;

LEXICON VerbAgrFut_VHA_V
+1sg:ım     #;

LEXICON VerbAgrCond_VHA
+1sg:m      #;
+2sg:n      #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:k      #;
+2pl:nız    #;
+3pl:lar    #;

LEXICON VerbAgrNec_VHA
+1sg:yım    #;
+2sg:sın    #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:yız    #;
+2pl:sınız  #;
+3pl:lar    #;

LEXICON VerbAgrAor_VHA
+1sg:ım     #;
+2sg:sın    #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:ız     #;
+2pl:sınız  #;
+3pl:lar    #;

LEXICON VerbAgrImp_VHA
+2sg:0      #;
+2pl:ın     #;
+3sg:sın    #;
+3pl:sınlar #;

! ============================================================
! BACK UNROUNDED L-FINAL - aorist -ır (al)
! ============================================================

LEXICON VerbVHA_L
+Neg:0              VerbTAM_VHA_L_Neg;
0                   VerbTAM_VHA_L;

LEXICON VerbTAM_VHA_L
+Pres:ıyor          VerbAgrPres;
+Past:dı            VerbAgrPast_VHA;
+Past+Evid:mış      VerbAgrPast_VHA;
+Fut:acak           VerbAgrFut_VHA;
+Fut:acağ           VerbAgrFut_VHA_V;
+Cond:sa            VerbAgrCond_VHA;
+Nec:malı           VerbAgrNec_VHA;
+Aor:ır             VerbAgrAor_VHA;
+Inf:mak            #;
+VN:ma              #;
+Imp:0              VerbAgrImp_VHA;

LEXICON VerbTAM_VHA_L_Neg
+Pres:mıyor         VerbAgrPres;
+Past:madı          VerbAgrPast_VHA;

! ============================================================
! BACK ROUNDED VOWEL-FINAL (oku)
! FIX: oku+uyor -> okuyor (no y epenthesis - u+uyor = uyor)
! ============================================================

LEXICON VerbVHO_V
+Neg:0              VerbTAM_VHO_V_Neg;
0                   VerbTAM_VHO_V;

LEXICON VerbTAM_VHO_V
+Pres:yor           VerbAgrPres;
+Past:du            VerbAgrPast_VHO;
+Fut:yacak          VerbAgrFut_VHA;
+Fut:yacağ          VerbAgrFut_VHA_V;
+Aor:r              VerbAgrAor_VHO;
+Inf:mak            #;
+VN:ma              #;
+Imp:0              VerbAgrImp_VHA;

LEXICON VerbTAM_VHO_V_Neg
+Pres:mıyor         VerbAgrPres;
+Past:madu          VerbAgrPast_VHO;

LEXICON VerbAgrPast_VHO
+1sg:m      #;
+2sg:n      #;
+3sg:0      #;
+1pl:k      #;
+2pl:nuz    #;
+3pl:lar    #;
